Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support
§ 21-13-315.
Costs of court ordered placement of children in private residential treatment facilities, group homes, day treatment programs and juvenile detention facilities.

The department of family services shall establish an account to pay residential and treatment costs excluding educational and medical costs of court ordered placements of children in private residential treatment facilities and group homes located in Wyoming. Programs providing education services including programs for children with disabilities provided by a board of cooperative educational services, shall bill the department of education directly for educational costs of court ordered placements. In addition, costs of all services provided pursuant to a student’s individualized education program, including special education services, related services and supplementary aids and services for children with disabilities and costs of education assessment for other children incurred as a result of court order prior to any placement, shall be billed directly to the department of education. The department of family services shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to provide procedures for implementing subsection (m) of this section. If the court rejects an in-state placement recommendation of the predisposition report or multidisciplinary team under W.S.

14-6-227

or

14-6-427

, the court shall enter on the record specific findings of fact relied upon to support its decision to deviate from the recommended disposition. No court shall order an out-of-state placement unless:

Evidence has been presented to the court regarding the costs of the out-of-state placement being ordered together with evidence of the comparative costs of any suitable alternative in-state treatment program or facility, as determined by the department of family services pursuant to paragraph (d)(vii) of this section, whether or not placement in the in-state program or facility is currently available;

The court makes an affirmative finding on the record that no placement can be made in a Wyoming institution or in a private residential treatment facility or group home located in Wyoming that can provide adequate treatment or services for the child; and

The court states on the record why no in-state placement is available.

Except to the extent costs are covered under subsection (n) of this section, the department of education using federal or foundation funds, or both, shall pay for the allowable education costs of juvenile and district court ordered placements of children residing in private treatment facilities and group homes where a fee is charged, including court ordered placements in programs for children with disabilities provided by a board of cooperative educational services. No district shall receive funds, either directly or indirectly, from any facility or home receiving payment under this section for providing education programs and services to children placed and residing in the facility or home, but the district may count the children among its average daily membership if the district provides education services directly to the children or pays another district to provide education services to the children pursuant to contract. The department of education shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations prescribing standards and allowable costs for educational program services funded under this section. Standards shall be subject to W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and rules and regulations of the state board and shall be designed to fit the unique populations of residential centers, group homes, programs and services provided by boards of cooperative educational services and out of state placement facilities.

Costs shall be billed monthly by the program provider to:

The department of family services account for residential and treatment services; and

Except to the extent costs are covered under subsection (n) of this section, the department of education for approved educational services specified under subsection (b) of this section.

If a placement of a child is to be made and funded under this section, the predisposition study required by W.S.

14-6-227

or

14-6-427

shall include:

A description of efforts to provide services to the child in the home prior to placement;

Contact with other agencies involved with the child. At a minimum, those contacted shall include the child’s school and the field office of the department of family services;

The presence of any preexisting and identified handicapping conditions;

A review of the financial resources of the child’s parent or guardian;

A certification by the department of family services that funding for the placement is available within the appropriation. The placement of the child shall not be funded under this section if the department of family services is unable to make the certification. The department of family services shall make the certification only if unencumbered funds are available within the appropriation making allowance for the costs for children already placed. Funds shall not be certified available if an adequate, less restrictive, less expensive placement is available;

The names of persons and agencies contacted in preparing the report; and

If an out-of-state placement is under consideration, the name, address, program description and costs of each Wyoming institution and each private residential treatment facility and group home located in Wyoming that the department of family services has determined can provide adequate treatment or services for the child, and whether placement in the in-state institution, treatment facility or group home is available.

If at any time the placement is found to be educationally inappropriate or not the least restrictive placement available, the placement shall be referred back to the court with a recommendation on what would be a suitable placement.

Only group homes and residential treatment facilities certified by the department of family services are eligible to receive funding for residential and treatment services under this section. Costs for education services shall be paid by the department of education under this section only if the educational program of the group home or residential treatment facility or the program provided by the board of cooperative educational services meets the standards of subsection (b) of this section and has been approved by the department. The department of family services and the department of education shall provide the courts with a list of approved facilities and services. The court shall determine the parents’ or the guardian’s contribution to the court ordered placement for all costs excluding necessary education costs based on the parents’ or guardian’s ability to pay as provided by W.S.

14-6-236

or

14-6-435

.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 221, § 2.

In the placement order the court shall declare the child’s school district or school districts of residency in any district or districts which it deems proper in the best interests of the child. The declaration by the court shall be binding upon the school districts.

In the placement order the court shall determine that adequate efforts were made to maintain the child in the child’s home prior to placement.

Except as otherwise provided by law, this section applies to children who are at least five (5) years of age as of August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b) but who are under twenty-one (21) years of age.

The department of family services shall regularly monitor the amount of unencumbered funds available within the appropriation making allowance for the costs for children already placed. If the projected costs exceed the amount available, the division shall terminate its contracts for services under this section after notice of thirty (30) days and reduce the rates it pays to all providers by a uniform percentage. The percentage shall be determined by the division and shall bring the costs and projected fund availability into balance. The division shall readjust rates dependent upon change in availability of funds.

Prior to billing the department of education under paragraph (c)(ii) of this section, program providers shall bill the department of health for costs of approved educational services covered under the school health program under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act pursuant to W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxx).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 117, § 1; 1985, ch. 111, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 229, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 20, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 301(a), § 501; 2004, ch. 111, § 1; 2012, ch. 100, § 1; 2017 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), added the exception at the beginning, and inserted “of education” following “the department”; rewrote (c)(ii), which formerly read: “The department for approved educational services”; and added (n).

Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “services provided pursuant to a student’s individualized education plan (IEP), including special education services, related services and supplementary aids and services” for “related services” in the third sentence of the introductory language of (a).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “education program” for “education plan (IEP)” in the third sentence and added “or

14-6-427

” after “ W.S.

14-6-227

” near the end of the paragraph; in the introductory language of (d), added “or

14-6-427

” after “ W.S.

14-6-227

”; in (f) added “or

14-6-435

” after “ W.S.

14-6-236

” at the end of the paragraph; and in (k) substituted “Except as otherwise provided by law, this section applies to children who are at least five (5) years of age as of September 15 of the applicable school year but who are under twenty-one (21) years of age” for “this section applies to children who are at least six (6) years of age but who are under twenty-one (21) years of age.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), added “if the district provides education services directly to the children or pays another district to provide education services to the children pursuant to contract” to the end of the second sentence.

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (b) added “if the district provides education services directly to the children or pays another district to provide education services to the children pursuant to contract.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 1, 2021, in (k) substituted “as of August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b)” for “as of September 15 of the applicable school year.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

An internal reference in (n) to W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxix) has been changed to W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xxx) to conform with the redesignation of the paragraph added by Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 1 by the legislative service office.

Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 2, provides:

“(a) The department of education shall account for and track children placed under W.S.

21-13-315

and receiving educational services. The reporting shall provide for the length of time children are receiving services, the types of educational services received and expenditures per child. The department of education, in consultation with the legislative service office, shall combine the information reported and collected under subsection (a) of this section with comprehensive information on the number of children placed in residential treatment facilities, group homes, programs for children with disabilities provided by boards of cooperative educational services and other facilities in which children are placed from the time of detention through court disposition, and shall examine cost efficient alternatives to residential and group home placements including day treatment and juvenile detention facilities. In addition, the report shall provide detailed information on the length of time a child is placed in a facility or program, the expenditures by the state on behalf of the child for placement in the program or facility, the child's state of residence, expenditures on behalf of the child for any medical costs, and shall include placement and expenditures for each child placed out of state. The court, the department of family services and the department of health shall provide the department of education necessary information to compile the reports required under this section and shall cooperate with and assist the department with data collection and study efforts. The compilation of information shall be compared to previous expenditures for programs and services of children placed under W.S.

21-13-315

and shall provide estimates of future expenditures for these programs and services.

“(b) The information collected and compiled under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be assembled and reported to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee by December 1, 2004.

“(c) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of education to collect and assemble the information required under this section.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 3, provides:

“(a) In addition to any other appropriation to implement the medical assistance and services program, there is appropriated to the department of health for fiscal year 2004-2005 one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000.00) from the school foundation program account and two hundred sixty thousand dollars ($260,000.00) from federal funds to implement the Medicaid school health program for children placed or detained by the court under W.S.

21-13-315

for school year 2004-2005 as authorized under section 1 of this act. The department of health shall provide monthly reports to the state department of education itemizing the total amount expended during the previous month for programs and services under the school health program.

“(b) For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2005 only, one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) is appropriated from the school foundation program account to the department of education for the provision of educational programs and services to children placed in juvenile detention facilities commencing the day following the detention hearing. Programs shall be provided to those children medically capable of receiving educational programs. If the department determines funds appropriated are insufficient to fund all programs in accordance [with] this subsection, the department shall give priority to those children placed on an extended basis. Funds appropriated under this section shall not be expended for educational programs provided to those children placed under W.S.

21-13-315

. The department shall collect information on children placed in detention facilities, educational services provided to these children and the costs of services provided to these children, which shall be included in the information and analysis contained within the information collected, compiled and reported under section 2 of this act.

“(c) Two hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars ($268,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of education to fund two (2) additional full-time positions necessary to carry out this act and to monitor the quality and costs of education programs provided to court placements. As required under section 2 of this act, the department of family services and the department of health shall cooperate with, assist and report to the positions authorized under this subsection as necessary to collect information and conduct the study required by this act.”

Applied

in

In re DCP, 2001 WY 77,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 91

, 30 P.3d 29 (Wyo. 2001).

§ 21-13-316.
Interfund borrowing.

The state treasurer may utilize interfund loans to the school foundation program account to ensure statutory payments are made when dedicated revenues are not yet received. Interfund loans under this subsection may be made from the legislative stabilization reserve account or, to the extent insufficient funds exist in the legislative stabilization reserve account, the common school account within the permanent land fund. Any interfund loans executed pursuant to this section shall be repaid in whole or in part periodically as soon as school foundation program account revenues permit.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 82, § 2.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 218, § 1; 1988, ch. 82, § 2; 2017 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “school foundation program account” for “foundation account” in the first and second sentences, and substituted “Any interfund loans executed pursuant to this section” for “However, any interfund loans shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per year payable from the foundation account to the common school account within the permanent land income fund and” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “from the common school account within the permanent land fund” following “utilize interfund loans,” substituted “ensure” for “enable,” “are” for “to be” preceding “made” and added the second sentence in (a).

§ 21-13-317.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 304.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 64, § 1, related to foundation account payments to state institutions for special education programs.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see §

21-13-321

.

§ 21-13-318.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 201, pertained to state financial support for small schools.

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 14(a) makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-13-319.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 201, related to adjustments to the school foundation program formula for small schools.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 21(a), makes the act effective on July 1, 2002.

§ 21-13-320.
Student transportation; amount within school foundation program formula for transportation maintenance and operations expenditures and school bus purchases; district reporting requirements.

The amount provided for the transportation of school children within the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(I) shall be computed in accordance with this section.

There shall be an amount computed for each school district equal to the base price amount for bus purchase and lease payment expenditures made by the district during the previous school year pursuant to subsection (g) of this section and for the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for:

The maintenance and operation of transportation routes for transporting school children to and from school; and

The transportation of students to and from student activities authorized by department of education rules. For the purpose of this paragraph, student activities means athletic and nonathletic activities sanctioned by the Wyoming high school activities association and school sponsored athletic and nonathletic activities in grades preceding high school which directly correspond to those high school activities sanctioned by the Wyoming high school activities association. No reimbursement shall be made for transportation expenses for student activities for expenses for transportation in excess of one hundred fifty (150) miles from the Wyoming border into another state.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 204, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 74, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 3.

The department of education shall adopt necessary rules and regulations to implement and enforce state standards established under this section and to administer this section. District expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this section shall not include expenditures for employee contributions to the Wyoming retirement system exceeding five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%) of any member employee’s salary. In addition, the department shall, in accordance with procedures prescribed by department rule and regulation, establish a base price for each school bus type or other student transportation vehicle type for the applicable fiscal period that complies with minimum state standards for vehicle specifications and equipment. The department shall also establish a process including competitive bidding which guarantees the acquisition of school buses and other student transportation vehicles approved for reimbursement and complying with state minimum standards and district fleet size restrictions at the established base price for the applicable fiscal year. Department rules shall establish appropriate restrictions on how and under which conditions a school district may procure a school bus or other student transportation vehicle, either through purchase or lease, to ensure that the procurement method used is the most cost effective. School districts shall notify the department of school bus and other student transportation vehicle needs and requirements for the appropriate fiscal year in the manner and within the times prescribed by department rule and regulation, and shall report expenditures, purchases and lease arrangements for the applicable reporting period, including vehicles replaced by purchases and leases, as required by department rule and regulation. The department shall annually review and conduct audits as necessary of information submitted under this section. As authorized under W.S. 21-13-307(b), the department may correct the information reported by districts under this section as necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the data type, classification and format required to administer this section in accordance with law and department rules and regulations.

In addition to subsection (b) of this section and for purchases and leases conducted in a manner consistent with department rules, the transportation adjustment for each district under this section shall include an amount computed under this subsection for the purchase or lease of school buses and other vehicles used primarily for the transportation of students to and from school and to and from school activities. Computations of amounts reimbursed under this subsection shall be based upon the base price established by the department under subsection (f) of this section for the student transportation vehicle type. Amounts included within the adjustment under this subsection shall be subject to the following:

Buses and other vehicles used primarily for student transportation, for which reimbursement is authorized, shall meet state minimum standards for vehicle specifications and equipment and shall be subject to vehicle replacement schedules specified by department rule and regulation;

The number of buses and other student transportation vehicles comprising a district’s fleet shall comply with fleet size standards established by rule of the department, which shall be established to ensure safe and efficient student transportation;

In consultation with the pupil transportation committee, the department shall by rule establish a replacement schedule for buses and other student transportation vehicles. The replacement schedule shall establish replacement cycles for mileage and age not less than the applicable national averages for replacement of school buses and other student transportation vehicles;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 204, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 204, § 4.

The adjustment for the purchase or lease of buses and other student transportation vehicles authorized under this subsection shall be equal to:

One-fifth (1/5) of the base price established under subsection (f) of this section for each purchased school bus or other purchased student transportation vehicle for which reimbursement is authorized and which is made by the district during the preceding five (5) years;

The base price established under subsection (f) of this section for lease payments for each school bus or other student transportation vehicle for which reimbursement is authorized and which is made by the district during the prior school year, plus the annual interest charges imposed under the lease arrangement.

Amounts included within the adjustment for purchases or leases that are fully or partially paid for or rebated under the Diesel Emissions Reduction Act, 42 U.S.C. § 16131 et seq., or other similar program, shall be made in accordance with department rule and regulation.

As used in this section:

“Lease” means a lease-purchase arrangement entered into by a school district, after a competitive quote or bidding process, for the acquisition and use of a student transportation vehicle approved for reimbursement under this section;

“Pupil transportation committee” means an advisory committee comprised of school district business managers, student transportation program managers and employees, district superintendents and other district personnel organized by the state department of education to assist the department in developing and maintaining state standards for vehicle specifications and equipment, vehicle fleet regulations and vehicle replacement schedules.

and (k) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 204, § 4.

No district shall purchase or lease a school bus unless it first demonstrates to the department and the department determines that the school district has in good faith attempted to purchase or lease a bus that will be fully or partially paid for or rebated under the Diesel Emissions Reduction Act, 42 U.S.C. 16131 et seq., or other similar program.

Except as needed to ensure shared services for the purpose of efficiency, educational stability for a child taken into protective custody or pursuant to an agreement under W.S.

21-4-502

, no district shall send or arrange to send any bus or other form of transportation into another school district for the purposes of loading or discharging students residing in that district.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 201; 2000, ch. 87, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 66, § 1; ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 74, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2018 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 204, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed former (d), which had provided combined incentive grants for transportation and special education reimbursements.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), substituted “amount provided” for “adjustment,” inserted “within the education resource block grant model,” and substituted “21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(I)” for “21-13-309(n)(i); in (b) deleted the first sentence concerning the amount computed under
W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iii), and substituted “an amount computed for each” for “an addition to the amount computed under
W.S. 21-13-309(p).”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (f), added the present second sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (j) through (m).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (j)(iii), inserted “but before July 1, 2018” following “March 15, 2017”; added (j)(iv) and (v); in (m), deleted “or enter into a new lease for a school bus” following “shall purchase a school bus,” added “except that, beginning July 1, 2018, a district may purchase a bus that will be fully or partially paid for or rebated under the Diesel Emissions Reduction Act, 42 U.S.C. 16131 et seq., or other similar program as confirmed by a letter of assurance from the state or federal government” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 204 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (b), substituted “equal to the base price” for “equal to the assigned percentage of the base price,” and “section and for the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year for” for “section, one hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by the district during the previous school year under subsection (c) of this section and for”; in (f), substituted “In addition and for purposes of reimbursement under subsection (g) of this section, the department shall in consultation with the pupil transportation committee, establish a minimum, average and optimal replacement schedule for each school bus type or other student transportation vehicle type” for “Department rules shall establish appropriate restrictions on how and under which conditions a school district may procure a school bus or other student transportation vehicle, either through purchase or lease, to ensure that the procurement method used is the most cost effective”; in the introductory language in (g), substituted “purchases and leases conducted in a manner consistent with department rules” for “buses purchased or leased on or after July 1, 2002,” in (g)(ii), substituted “by rule of the department, which shall be established to ensure safe and efficient student transportation” for “by the department in accordance with paragraph (c)(ii) of this section, unless otherwise waived by the department for the provision of safe and efficient student transportation services,” rewrote and designated the introductory language in (g)(iii) as (g)(iii), in (g)(v)(A), substituted “five (5) years” for “five (5) years, multiplied by the percentage assigned to the bus or other vehicle being replaced by the purchase as provided under paragraph (g)(iii) of this section.
For purposes of this subparagraph, any purchase made during the period beginning April 1, 2002, and ending June 30, 2002, shall not be included,” in (g)(v)(B), substituted “school year, plus” for “school year, multiplied by the percentage assigned to the bus or other vehicle being replaced by the leased vehicle as provided by paragraph (g)(iii) of this section, plus,” deleted the last sentence, and added (g)(vi); in (h)(ii), substituted “schedules” for “schedules including the establishment of minimum, average and optimal replacement schedules, as required under this section”; in (m), substituted “purchase or lease a school bus unless it first demonstrates” for “purchase a school bus on or after March 15, 2017 unless it first applies,” “that the school district has in good faith attempted to purchase or lease a bus” for “that an emergency exists necessitating the purchase or lease of the bus, except that, beginning July 1, 2018, a district may purchase a bus,” and “program” for “program as confirmed by a letter of assurance from the state or federal government. No district shall enter into a new lease for a school bus on or after July 1, 2018.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 204 § 4, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (c), which pertained to the percentages of transportation adjustment for buses purchased or leased; repealed (g)(iii)(A) through (C), which pertained to the replacement schedule, repealed (g)(iv), which read: “Paragraph (g)(iii) of this section shall not apply to the purchase or lease of a bus or other student transportation vehicle authorized under this section which expands a district's vehicle fleet and does not replace an existing vehicle, in which case the purchase or lease shall be reimbursed under paragraph (g)(v) of this section at one hundred percent (100%) of the base price”; repealed (j) and (k), which pertained to the computation of reimbursement for operations costs.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (n).

Savings clauses. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 66, § 2, provides that, notwithstanding any other provision of the act, amounts included within the transportation adjustment under W.S. 21-13-320(c)(iv) for amounts expended by districts for department approved purchases or leases of school buses or other student transportation vehicles made prior to April 1, 2002, are to continue in accordance with W.S. 21-13-320(c)(iv) until the lease arrangement expires, the total purchase amount is reimbursed or until June 30, 2007, whichever first occurs.

Constitutionality. —

The ten percent withholding limitation on transportation costs is not a constitutionally actionable penalty since districts experiencing an increase in spending will receive funding for the increase once they demonstrate that the increased expenditure was necessary to provide services during the school year and there is no limit upon the reimbursement of necessary transportation expenditures. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).